Utah statutes.
19-2-123.   Tax relief to encourage investment in facilities -- Sales and
use tax exemption.
(1)  It is in the public interest of the state to encourage, through tax
relief, investment in pollution control and pollution elimination facilities
while at the same time making and keeping the state an attractive location for
continued industrial development, including the expansion of existing plants,
thereby increasing employment and payrolls and upgrading the natural resources
of the state.
(2)  All materials and equipment purchased, leased, or otherwise procured and
services utilized for the construction or installation in a pollution control
facility are exempt from sales and use taxes imposed by Title 59, Chapter 12,
Sales and Use Tax Act, upon obtaining a certification of pollution control
facility from the board.
